South Dakota, session 2026, SB83.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-12A-11 be AMENDED:
32-12A-11. No person may be issued a commercial learner's permit unless that person
is a resident of this state and has passed the required knowledge test.
No person may be issued a commercial driver license unless that person is a
resident of this state, has received driver training from a provider listed on the Training
Provider Registry established by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration pursuant
to 49 C.F.R. Part 380, Subpart G, as of September 30, 2019, has passed a knowledge and
skills test for driving a commercial motor vehicle that complies with the minimum federal
standards established by federal regulation enumerated in 49 C.F.R. Part 383, Subparts
G and H, as of September 30, 2019, and has satisfied all other requirements of the CMVSA
in addition to other requirements imposed by state law or federal regulation. The tests
shall be prescribed and conducted by the department.
The department may authorize a person, an employer, a private driver training
facility, other private institution, a department, agency, or instrumentality of local
government, of this state or another state, to administer the skills test specified by this
section, if:
(1) The test is the same which would otherwise be administered by the
department;
(2) The third party has entered into an agreement with the department that
complies with requirements of 49 C.F.R. Part 383.75 as of September 30, 2019. Failure
to comply with the agreement may result in termination of the agreement; and
(3) The third party, prior to administering the skills test to any person, verifies the
person has completed the driver training specified in this section.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

83A 2 83
The department may waive the knowledge and skills tests specified in this section
for a commercial driver license applicant who meets the requirements of 49 C.F.R. Part
383.77 as of September 30, 2019.
No commercial learner's permit or commercial driver license may be issued to a
person while the person is subject to a disqualification from driving a commercial motor
vehicle, or while the person's operator's license or driving privilege is suspended, revoked,
or cancelled in any state; nor may a commercial driver license be issued to a person who
has a commercial driver license, noncommercial driver license, noncommercial instruction
permit or commercial learner's permit issued by any other state unless the person first
surrenders all such licenses or permits. The department shall destroy any license or permit
surrendered under this section. The issuing jurisdiction shall be notified that the licensee
has applied for a commercial learner's permit or commercial driver license in a new
jurisdiction. A violation of this provision is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person may not be issued a
commercial learner's permit unless that person:
(1) Is a resident of this state for the purpose of being licensed to drive a motor vehicle,
as described in § 32-12-26.1; and
(2) Has passed the general knowledge test that is required by 49 C.F.R. § 383.25
(January 1, 2026) and which complies with the minimum standards contained in
49 C.F.R. §§ 383.91 to 383.135, inclusive (January 1, 2026) for the commercial
vehicle that the person expects to operate.
The department may waive the knowledge test specified in this section for an
applicant who has experience operating a military commercial motor vehicle and meets
the requirements established in 49 C.F.R. § 383.77 (January 1, 2026).
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-12A:
Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person may not be issued a
commercial driver license unless that person:
(1) Is a resident of this state for the purpose of being licensed to drive a motor vehicle,
as described in § 32-12-26.1;
(2) Meets the general requirements of 49 C.F.R. § 383.23 (January 1, 2026) and has
passed the knowledge and driving skills tests that meet the federal standards
contained in 49 C.F.R. §§ 383.110 to 383.135, inclusive (January 1, 2026);
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

83A 3 83
(3) Has received entry-level driver training from a provider that meets the federal
standards established in 49 C.F.R. §§ 380.700 to 380.725, inclusive (January 1,
2026); and
(4) Has demonstrated proficiency in the English language, as required in the general
qualifications for commercial motor vehicle drivers established in 49 C.F.R.
§ 391.11 (January 1, 2026).
The department may waive the knowledge and skills tests specified in this section
for an applicant who has experience operating a military commercial motor vehicle and
meets the requirements established in 49 C.F.R. § 383.77 (January 1, 2026).
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-12A:
The department may authorize a third party to administer the skills test described
in section 2 of this Act, provided that the department and the third party comply with the
requirements of 49 C.F.R. § 383.75 (January 1, 2026).
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-12A:
The department may not issue a commercial learner's permit or commercial driver
license to a person while the person is subject to a disqualification from driving a
commercial motor vehicle, or while the person's operator's license or driving privilege is
suspended, revoked, or cancelled in any state.
The department may not issue a commercial driver license to a person who has a
commercial driver license, noncommercial driver license, noncommercial instruction
permit, or commercial learner's permit issued by any other state, unless the person first
surrenders the license or permit. The department shall destroy any license or permit
surrendered under this section. The department shall notify the issuing jurisdiction that
the license holder has surrendered the license or permit, in keeping with the single license
requirement established in 49 C.F.R. § 383.21 (January 1, 2026), to obtain a commercial
learner's permit or commercial driver license in this state.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-12A:
The department shall determine whether an applicant meets the English language
proficiency requirement set forth in section 2 of this Act by:
(1) Administering all knowledge and skills tests in English; and
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

83A 4 83
(2) Conducting an oral interview with an applicant, in English, if the applicant is
applying for a commercial driver license.
The department shall promulgate rules, in accordance with chapter 1-26, to
establish a list of open-ended questions to facilitate conversation regarding traffic signs
and signals, official inquiries by traffic officers, and reports and records necessary to the
operation of a commercial motor vehicle. The interviewer may ask any three questions
from the list during the oral interview to determine whether the applicant demonstrates
the required English language proficiency to obtain a commercial driver license in this
state.
The department may contract with a third party to conduct the interview required
by this section.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-12A:
An applicant for a commercial driver license who passes the knowledge and driving
tests but fails to demonstrate English language proficiency in the oral interview may repeat
the oral interview after fourteen days. The applicant may not obtain a commercial driver
license without demonstrating English language proficiency.
If the holder of a commercial driver license has not yet demonstrated English
language proficiency, the department must conduct an oral interview to determine English
language proficiency at the time the driver renews the commercial driver license.
If the holder of a commercial driver license or commercial learner's permit from a
jurisdiction outside this state is issued a citation for a traffic offense, or is involved in a
traffic accident, a law enforcement officer, except an officer acting under the authority of
§ 32-2-7, may use the list of questions required by section 5 of this Act to determine
whether the driver has sufficient English language proficiency to operate a commercial
vehicle in this state.
If the law enforcement officer determines the driver is unable to respond to official
inquiries in English proficiently, the officer must cite the driver for a violation of the English
proficiency requirement contained 49 C.F.R. § 391.11 (January 1, 2026), and place the
driver out of service.
The offense of operating a commercial motor vehicle in this state without sufficient
English language proficiency is:
(1) A Class 2 misdemeanor for a first offense; and
(2) A Class 1 misdemeanor for a second or subsequent offense.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

83A 5 83
Section 7. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-12A:
If a member of the armed forces of the United States or a family member, or a
government employee or a family member, is on an extended assignment outside the
continental United States and is unable to renew a commercial driver license in person,
that individual may renew the license using a form available on the Department of Public
Safety website, provided the applicant:
(1) Renews online no more than once in ten years;
(2) Is a United States citizen or a permanent resident;
(3) Holds a valid, federally compliant license with a gold star;
(4) Holds a valid medical certificate; and
(5) Provides proof of residency and all other information the department requires.
An applicant may not renew remotely if the applicant is changing to a different
class of commercial driver license, changing endorsements, or changing a name. An
applicant who wears bioptic lenses may not renew remotely.

Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.